Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2016.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-22-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-22 entitled "Curriculum
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read
as follows:
16-22-2. Civics education.
(a) The general assembly recognizes the importance of a citizenry well educated in the
principles of democracy as enunciated in the constitutions of the state of Rhode Island and the
United States. The general assembly directs the board of regents for elementary and secondary
education to develop and adopt a set of grade level standards K-12 in civics education no later than
August 31, 2007. These standards shall include, but not be limited to, the history of the state of
Rhode Island, representative government, the rights and duties of actively engaged citizenship, and
the principals principles of democracy, and media literacy. These civic education standards shall
be used in the public schools of this state beginning in kindergarten and continuing through to and
including grade 12. No private school or private instruction shall be approved for the purposes of
chapter 19 of this title unless the course of study shall make provision for instruction substantially
equivalent to that required by this chapter for public schools.
(b) All middle and high school students attending public schools, or any other schools
managed and controlled by the state, shall demonstrate proficiency, as defined by the local school
district, in civics education that shall also satisfy half credit or course requirement in history and
social studies.

(c) Each public school district shall provide not less than one student-led civics project for
students during either middle or high school; provided, however, that each such project shall be
consistent with the history and social studies standards and frameworks promulgated by the Rhode
Island board of education. Civics projects may be individual, small group, or class wide, and
designed to promote a student’s ability to:
(1) Reason, make logical arguments, and support claims using valid evidence; and
(2) Demonstrate an understanding of the connections between federal, state, and local
policies, including issues that may impact the student’s community.
(d) The department of education shall begin implementing subsections (b) and (c) of this
section for the 2022-2023 academic year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003233
========
LC003233 - Page 2 of 3